Hawaii statutes.
§651-36 Execution, courts of record; form.
The forms of executions to be issued from courts of record shall be the same as
have been established by the usage and practice of such courts; but alterations
therein may, from time to time, be made or allowed by the supreme court, when
necessary to adapt them to changes in the law, or for other sufficient reasons.
[CC 1859, §1019; RL 1925, §2440; RL 1935, §4139; RL 1945, §10166; RL 1955,
§233-35; HRS §651-36]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next